Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-108
Director of the Nebraska State Historical Society; documents and records; certified copies; fees.

The Director of the Nebraska State Historical Society shall prepare certified copies of any record, document, or other material, of which the society is the custodian, whenever application shall be made to the society. Such certified copies shall be received in courts and elsewhere as being of the same legal validity as similar copies prepared by the original custodian of the record, document, or other material. The Director of the Nebraska State Historical Society is entitled to the same fees as the original custodian for making such certified copies.

Laws 1905, c. 157, § 5, p. 605;

R.S.1913, § 7173;

C.S.1922, § 6824;

C.S.1929, § 82-108;

R.S.1943, § 82-108;

Laws 2024, LB1169, § 9.